Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.085

Licensee—Assessment—Bond—Time of payment.

(1) A licensee shall, for each license held by any person, on or before the first day of each March, pay to the director an annual assessment as determined by rule by the director. The licensee shall be responsible for payment of the annual assessment for the previous calendar year if the licensee had a license for any time during the preceding calendar year, regardless of whether they surrendered their license during the calendar year or whether their license was suspended or revoked. At the same time the licensee shall file with the director the required bond or otherwise demonstrate compliance with RCW 31.04.045.

(2) The director may establish a different yearly assessment fee for persons servicing residential mortgage loans.

[ 2010 c 35 s 5; 2001 c 81 s 7; 1994 c 92 s 165; 1991 c 208 s 9.]